District of Columbia statutes.
2-353.01

Contractor standards.

The CPO shall establish a process to certify, on a solicitation-by-solicitation basis, the responsibility of prospective contractors. The process shall ensure that the prospective contractor:

(1)

Has adequate financial resources to perform the contract or the ability to obtain those resources;

(2)

Is able to comply with the required or proposed delivery or performance schedule, based upon the bidder’s or offeror’s existing commercial and government contract commitments;

(3)

Has a satisfactory performance record;

(4)

Has a satisfactory record of integrity and business ethics;

(5)

Has a satisfactory record of compliance with the law, including labor and civil rights laws and rules and part A of subchapter X of Chapter 2 of this title [§ 2-219.01 et seq.];

(6)

Has, or has the ability to obtain, the necessary organization, experience, accounting, operational control, and technical skills;

(7)

Has, or has the ability to obtain, the necessary production, construction, technical equipment, and facilities;

(8)

Has not exhibited a pattern of overcharging the District;

(9)

Does not have an outstanding debt with the District or the federal government in a delinquent status; and

(10)

Is otherwise qualified and is eligible to receive an award under applicable laws and rules.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 301, 58 DCR 1185

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-353.02.